Maryland, session 2026, SB0794.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0794*

SENATE BILL 794
15–1316.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Dependent” means an individual who is or who may become eligible
for coverage under the terms of a health benefit plan because of a relationship with another
individual.
(3) “Health care practitioner” has the meaning stated in § 1–301 of the
Health Occupations Article.
(4) “Qualifying coverage in an eligible employer–sponsored plan” has the
meaning stated in 45 C.F.R. § 155.300.
(c) A carrier participating in the Individual Exchange shall provide:
(1) the special enrollment periods specified in 45 C.F.R. § 155.420 for
individuals who purchase coverage through the Individual Exchange; and
(2) a special enrollment period for an individual who purchases coverage
through the Individual Exchange if the individual or a dependent of the individual becomes
pregnant, as confirmed by a health care practitioner.
(d) A carrier shall provide:
(1) the special enrollment periods specified in 45 C.F.R. § 147.104(b)(2) for
individuals who purchase coverage outside the Individual Exchange; and
(2) a special enrollment period for an individual who purchases coverage
outside the Individual Exchange if the individual or a dependent of the individual becomes
pregnant, as confirmed by a health care practitioner.
(e) A special enrollment period described in subsection (c)(2) or (d)(2) of this
section shall:
(1) be open for a period of 90 days; and
(2) begin on the date the health care practitioner confirms the pregnancy.
(f) (1) If an individual enrolls for coverage during one of the open enrollment
periods described in subsection (b) of this section or during one of the special open
enrollment periods described in subsections (c)(1) and (d)(1) of this section, coverage shall
be effective in accordance with the requirements in 45 C.F.R. § 155.420.
(2) (I) If an individual enrolls for coverage or enrolls a dependent for
coverage during a special enrollment period described in subsection (c)(2) or (d)(2) of this

SENATE BILL 794 3
section, the INDIVIDUAL MAY CHOOSE WHETHER THE coverage [shall become]
BECOMES effective on:
1. the first day of the month in which the individual receives
confirmation of pregnancy; OR
2. THE FIRST DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING THE DATE
OF PLAN SELECTION.
(II) IF THE INDIVIDUAL FAILS TO SELECT THE DAY ON WHICH
COVERAGE BECOMES EFFECTIVE, THE CARRIER SHALL SELECT THE DAY FROM
THOSE LISTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.